Utah statutes.
67-19-38.   Violations and penalties.
In addition to other criminal penalties provided by law, an employee who:
(1)  fails to notify the employee's director under Section 67-19-35 is subject
to disciplinary proceedings as established by the executive director by rule
in accordance with Section 67-19-34;
(2)  refuses to submit to testing procedures provided for in Section 67-19-36,
may be suspended immediately without pay pending further disciplinary action
as set forth in the rules of the executive director in accordance with Section
67-19-34; or
(3)  tests positive for the presence of unlawfully used controlled substances
or alcohol may be required, as part of the employee's disciplinary treatment,
to complete a drug rehabilitation program at the employee's expense within 60
days after receiving the positive test results or be subject to further
disciplinary procedures established by rule of the executive director in
accordance with Section 67-19-34.
